Utah statutes.
41-22-31.   Board to set standards for safety program -- Safety certificates issued -- Cooperation with public and private entities -- State immunity from suit.

(1)  The board shall establish curriculum standards for a comprehensive off-highway vehicle safety education and training program and shall implement this program.

(a)  The program shall be designed to develop and instill the knowledge, attitudes, habits, and skills necessary for the safe operation of an off-highway vehicle.

(b)  Components of the program shall include the preparation and dissemination of off-highway vehicle information and safety advice to the public and the training of off-highway vehicle operators.

(c)  Off-highway vehicle safety certificates shall be issued to those who successfully complete training or pass the knowledge and skills test established under the program.

(2)  The division shall cooperate with appropriate private organizations and associations, private and public corporations, and local government units to implement the program established under this section.

(3)  In addition to the governmental immunity granted in Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah, the state is immune from suit for any act, or failure to act, in any capacity relating to the off-highway vehicle safety education and training program.  The state is also not responsible for any insufficiency or inadequacy in the quality of training provided by this program.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

